Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202537-1017
Trail Development and Maintenance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Trail Development and Maintenance Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of transfers at the direction of the Legislature and any gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private entities. The Game and Parks Commission shall administer the fund to provide grants to natural resources districts to assist in completing the Missouri-Pacific trail between the cities of Lincoln and Omaha. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Trail Development and Maintenance Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 6;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 126.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.